Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-545
District officers; vacancy.

Vacancies in each school district office shall occur as set forth in section 32-570 and be filled according to such section.

Laws 1881, c. 78, subdivision V, § 10, p. 354;

R.S.1913, § 6790;

C.S.1922, § 6331;

C.S.1929, § 79-510;

R.S.1943, § 79-510;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 101, p. 726;

Laws 1951, c. 276, § 5, p. 930;

Laws 1953, c. 291, § 4, p. 990;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 79-462;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 596;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-467.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 298.